Hawaii statutes.
§707-766 Extortion in the second degree.
(1) A person commits the offense of extortion in the second degree if the
person commits extortion:

(a) Of property, labor, or services the value of
which exceeds $50 during any twelve-month period; or

(b) As set forth in section 707-764(2).

(2) Extortion in the second degree is a class
C felony. [L 1979, c 106, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 28, §1; am L 2008, c 147, §6]

Case Notes

Terroristic threatening in the second degree is not a lesser
included offense of attempted extortion in the second degree. 70 H. 456, 776
P.2d 392 (1989).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next